Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.250

Down syndrome—Parent information.

A physician licensed under this chapter who provides a parent with a positive prenatal or postnatal diagnosis of Down syndrome shall provide the parent with the information prepared by the department under RCW 43.70.738 at the time the physician provides the parent with the Down syndrome diagnosis.

[ 2016 c 70 s 5.]